Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down

Yeah, I guess I'm a disappointment, doin' everything I can
I don't wanna make you disappointed, it's annoying
I just wanna make you feel like everything I ever do
Was never tryna make an issue for you, but I guess the more you
Thought about everything you were never even wrong
In the first place, right? Yeah, I'ma just ignore you
Walking towards you with my head down
Lookin' at the ground, I'm embarrassed for you
Paranoia, what did I do wrong this time?
That's parents for you
Very loyal? Shoulda had my back
But you put a knife in it—my hands are full
What else should I carry for you?
I cared for you, but…

Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down

Yeah, you don't wanna make this work
You just wanna make this worse
Want me to listen to you, but you don't ever hear my words
You don't wanna know my hurt yet
Let me guess, you want an apology, probably
How can we keep going at a rate like this?
We can't, so I guess I'ma have to leave
Please, don't come after me
I just wanna be alone right now, I don't really wanna think at all
Go ahead, just drink it off
Both know you're gonna call tomorrow like nothing's wrong
Ain't that what you always do?
I feel like every time I talk to you, you're in an awful mood
What else can I offer you?
There's nothing left right now, I gave it all to you

Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Le-le-let you down

Yeah, don't talk down to me
That's not gonna work now
Packed all my clothes and I moved out
I don't even wanna go to your house
Every time I sit on that couch
I feel like you lecture me, eventually, I bet that we
Could have made this work
And prolly woulda figured things out
But I guess I'm a letdown
But it's cool, I checked out
Oh, you wanna be friends now?
Okay, let's put my fake face on and pretend now
Sit around and talk about the good times that didn't even happen
I mean, why are you laughing?
Must have missed that joke, let me see if I can find a reaction
No, but at least you're happy

Feels like we're on the edge right now
I wish that I could say I'm proud
I'm sorry that I let you down
Oh, I let you down
All these voices in my head get loud
And I wish that I could shut them out
I'm sorry that I let you down
Oh, let you down

I'm sorry
I'm so sorry now
I'm sorry that I let you down
How could you leave so unexpected?
We waited, we waited
For you, but you just left us
We needed you, I needed you

Yo, I don't know what it's like to be addicted to pills
But I do know what it's like to be a witness, it kills
Mama told me she loved me, I'm thinkin' this isn't real
I think of you when I get a whiff of that cigarette smell, yeah
Welcome to the bottom of hell
They say pain is a prison, let me out of my cell
You say you proud of me, but you don't know me that well
Sit in my room, tears running down my face and I yell
Into my pillowcases, you say you coming to get us
Then call 'em a minute later just to tell us you not, I'm humiliated
I'm in a room with a parent that I don't barely know
Some lady in the corner watching us while she's taking notes
I don't get it mom, don't you want to watch your babies grow?
I guess pills are more important, all you have to say is "no"
But you won't do it, will you? You gon' keep popping, 'til those pills kill you
I know you're gone, but I can still feel you

Why would you leave us? Why would you leave us here?
How could you leave us here?
How could you leave us? Why would you leave us? Oh
Hey

I got this picture in my room and it kills me
But I don't need a picture of my mom, I need the real thing
Now a relationship is something we won't ever have, but why do I feel like I lost something that I never had?
You should have been there when I graduated
Told me you loved me and congratulations, instead you left us at the window waitin'
Where you at mom?
We're too young to understand, where you at, huh?
Yeah, I know them drugs have got you held captive
I can see it in your eyes, they got your mind captured
Some say it's fun to get the high, but I am not laughin'
And what you don't realize and what you not graspin'
That I was nothing but a kid, who couldn't understand it
I ain't gon' say that I forgive you 'cause it hasn't happened
I thought that maybe I'd feel better as time passes
If you really cared for me, then where you at then?

Why would you leave us? Why would you leave us here?
How could you leave us here?
How could you leave us? Why would you leave us? Oh
Hey

Our last conversation, you and I sat in the living room
Talkin' 'bout my music and I brought you some to listen to
You started cryin', telling me "this isn't you"
A couple weeks later, guess you were singin' a different tune
You took them pills for the last time, didn't you?
They took you from us once, I guess they came back to finish you
Cryin' my eyes out in the studio is difficult
Music is the only place that I can go to speak to you
It took everything inside of me, not to scream at your funeral
Sittin' in my chair, that person talkin' was pitiful
I wish you were here, mama, but every time I picture you
All I feel is pain, I hate the way I remember you
They found you on the floor, I could tell you felt hollow
Gave everything you had, plus your life to them pill bottles
You gave everything you had, plus your life to them pill bottles
Don't know if you hear me or not, but if you're still watching, why?

Why would you leave us? Why would you leave us here?
How could you leave us here?
How could you leave us? Why would you leave us? Oh
Hey

Sometimes I think about like
Sometimes I think about things like, you know
When I'd have kids, I'm like
You won't be there, you know?
You won't be there for any of that
And I'll never get to see you again
Sometimes I wish I would've just called you
I wish I would have just picked up the phone
Wish you were here
I mean you should of been there for us
You should have been here!
Them pills got you, right?
Them pills got you, right?
I wish you were here…
Insidious is blind inception
What's reality with all these questions?
Feels like I missed my alarm and slept in
Slept in
Broken legs, but I chase perfection
These walls are my blank expression
My mind is a home I'm trapped in
And it's lonely inside this mansion

Yo, my mind is a house with walls, covered in lyrics
They're all over the place, there's songs in the mirrors
Written all over the floors, all over the chairs
And you get the uncut version of life when I go downstairs
That's where I write when I'm in a bad place and need to release
And let out the version of NF you don't wanna see
I put holes in the walls with both of my fists 'til they bleed
You might get a glimpse of how I cope with all this anger in me
Physically abused, now that's the room that I don't wanna be in
That picture ain't blurry at all, I just don't wanna see it
And these walls ain't blank, I just think I don't wanna see 'em
But why not? I'm in here, so I might as well read 'em
I gotta thank you for this anger that I carry around
Wish I could take a match and burn this whole room to the ground
Matter of fact, I think I'ma burn this room right now
Somehow, this memory, for some reason, just won't come down
You used to put me in the corner, so you could see the fear in my eyes
Then took me downstairs and beat me 'til I screamed and I cried
Congratulations, you'll always have a room in my mind
But I'ma keep the door shut and lock the lyrics inside

Insidious is blind inception
What's reality with all these questions?
Feels like I missed my alarm and slept in
And slept in
Broken legs, but I chase perfection
These walls are my blank expression
My mind is a home I'm trapped in
And it's lonely inside this mansion, inside this mansion

Yo, my mind is a house with walls, covered in pain
See, my problem is, I don't fix things, I just try to repaint
Cover 'em up, like it never happened, say, "I wish I could change"
Are you confused? Come upstairs and I'll show you what I mean
This room's full of regrets, it just keeps getting fuller, it seems
The moment I walk into it's the same moment that I wanna leave
I get sick to my stomach every time I look at these things
But it's hard to look past when this is the room where I sleep
I look around, one of the worst things I wrote on these walls
Was the moment I realized that I was losing my mom
One of the first things I wrote was, "I wish I woulda called"
But I should just stop now, we ain't got enough room in this song
And I regret the fact that I struggled trying to find who I am
And I lie to myself and say I do the best that I can
Shrug it off like it ain't nothing, like it's out of my hands
Then get ticked off whenever I see it affecting my plans
And I regret watchin' these trust issues eat me alive
And at the rate I'm goin', they'll probably still be there when I die
Congratulations, you'll always have a room in my mind
The question is, will I ever clean the walls off in time?

Insidious is blind inception
What's reality with all these questions?
Feels like I missed my alarm and slept in
And slept in
Broken legs, but I chase perfection
These walls are my blank expression
My mind is a home I'm trapped in
And it's lonely inside this mansion, inside this mansion

So this part of my house, no one's been in it for years
I built a safe room and I don't let no one in there
'Cause if I do, there's a chance that they might disappear
And not come back, and I admit, I am emotionally scared
To let anyone inside, so I just leave my doors locked
You might get other doors to open up, but this door's not
'Cause I don't want you to have the opportunity to hurt me
And I'll be the only person that I can blame when you desert me
I'm barricaded inside, so stop watchin'
I'm not coming to the door, so stop knockin', stop knockin'
I'm trapped here, God keeps saying I'm not locked in
I chose this, I am lost in my own conscience
I know that shuttin' the world out ain't solvin' the problem
But I didn't build this house because I thought it would solve 'em
I built it because I thought that it was safer in there
But it's not, I'm not the only thing that's livin' in here
Fear came to my house years ago, I let him in
Maybe that's the problem, 'cause I've been dealing with this ever since
I thought that he would leave, but it's obvious, he never did
He must have picked the room and got comfortable and settled in
Now I'm in a position, it's either sit here, and let 'em win
Or put him back outside where he came from, but I never can
'Cause in order to do that, I'd have to open the doors
Is that me or the fear talking? I don't know anymore

It's lonely
Inside (inside), inside (inside)
It's lonely (it's lonely)
Oh, yeah, it's loney
Inside this mansion
I'm lookin' like I'm gonna get it, you prolly don't get it
I come in your house with a microphone
Lookin' like I'm 'bout to set up a show in your kitchen
I'm out of my mind, but I feel like I'm in it
If I never make it, don't make any difference
I'm still gonna kill it, you know what the deal is
Ain't never no chillin' when I'm in the buildin'
NF is a monster, I am a villain
My music is sick, and you don't know what "ill" is
You better get back, I don't write any filler
I write what I feel and I'm feelin' a million
So you better shh, be quiet, you hear it?
I'm 'bout to lose it
I'm on a whole different level of music
Don't treat me like I have no clue how to do this
You better rethink what you're thinkin' and move it
Now picture me writin' when I was a kid tryna make it in music, I think it is crazy
I spent all my money on studio time, tryna get on my music so people could play it
I'ma keep it one hundred, my music was terrible, learned to get better, the more that I made it
Go back to my Moments album, most of you people, you prolly don't know what I'm sayin', hold up!
What you're witnessin' now? Don't try to figure me out
I grab on that microphone, jawin' the crowd
They was laughin' at me, who they laughin' at now, huh?
I laugh at myself, some people they lookin' like, "wow"
The moment you told me that you was a rapper
I couldn't believe it, you believe it now?
Step in the booth and I murder it
You never heard of a rapper that kill it like I do
I sleep on the couch in the studio
Stay up 'til three in the morning, and write 'til I get more
The moment I wake up I feel like I don't even sleep
And I'm ready to put out my record
Which, thank you for buyin', maybe you burned it
But either way, I'm gonna wreck it
I look at the industry, look what it did to me
You'll never make it if you never grind
You put a whole lot of money into it
You better be ready to give it your time
I look at the past awful years of my life
And I promise you I have been given it mine
Try to keep up with this, I'm not a puppet
No string on my back, I'm one of a kind
Music is changing, no way to tame this
I am an artist, look what I painted
Hang up the caution tape, I'm dangerous
Does anyone know where my brain is?
Rappers are comfortable knowin' they're famous
But I, really don't care what your name is
And I, really don't care if I'm nameless
Y'all just drivin' around, I know where my lane is
Cocky? Nah, I'm competitive?
This is a job for me, it's adrenaline
Don't try to box me in, I am Mayweather
I come in the ring, my punches are way better
I never drink, but I live in these bars
The moment you blink is the moment you lost
Say you a king, who put you in charge?
Don't care what you think, I'll break in your car
Climb on the top of it, sound the alarm
And wake up the neighborhood, rap in your yard
And carry the speakers on both of my arms
'Til you keep sleepin' on me, I'm at large
Enough with the jokes, I ain't jokin'
You come in a session with me, I'ma show you what dope is
And when I say "dope," I ain't talkin' 'bout smokin'
I'm talkin' 'bout music that has an emotion
I look at this mic, it's part of my family
Take it away, I'm comin' to find you
I've been through a lot in my life
And it's hard to get people to listen when no one's behind you
And then Capitol came in the picture and gave me a shot
And look at it now
I look at the team I'm dealin' with, agh
These people ain't playin' around
Lookin' back, I gotta laugh
I was in a whole different place a year ago
I look at the math, I look at the map
And thank you God, I swear it's a miracle
And I'm sorry, but I gotta leave
But, man, this track was beautiful
The least I can do if I murder a beat
Is take the time to go to its funeral, haha
Yeah, they say when we grow up
You'll understand when you're older
Guess I'm still a kid, I don't know it
If I'll ever let go of this (yeah)
Say goodbye to the old me
We ain't friends anymore, you don't know me (real music)
I know I could die any moment
If I do just remember this

Yeah, handouts create lazy people I'm not impressed with
You want something in life, then why don't you go and get it?
Actions speak louder than words do, it's pretty quiet, isn't it?
Look at the world we live in, defined by comment sections
Surround yourself with people that challenge how you think
Not people that nod their head and act like they agree
Those people will cut you open just to watch you bleed
Always be yourself, not the person that you pretend to be, no!
These people gon' tell you that you will never make it
Then when you do, they gon' say they knew you were goin' places
That's just how it works, next thing you know you'll be overrated
Hearing people say they miss the "old you," it's crazy, ain't it?
And perfect people don't exist, so don't pretend to be one
I don't need pats on the back from people for my achievements
When I die I wanna know that I lived for a reason
Anyone can take your life, but not what you believe in; no

Yeah, they say when we grow up
You'll understand when you're older
Guess I'm still a kid, I don't know it
If I'll ever let go of this
Say goodbye to the old me
We ain't friends anymore, you don't know me
I know I could die any moment
If I do just remember this

Yeah, don't take opinions from people that won't listen to yours
If money's where you find happiness, you'll always be poor
If you don't like the job you have, then what do you do it for?
The cure to pain isn't something you buy at liquor stores, nah
The real you is not defined by the size of your office
The real you is who you are when ain't nobody watchin'
You spend your whole life worried about what's in your wallet
For what? That money won't show up in your coffin, woo!
Yeah, anger's a liar, he ain't got no respect
I fell in love with my pain and I slept with my regrets
Happiness saw it happen, maybe that's why she up and left
Joy called me a cheater, said she ain't coming back
I've always had a problem with relationships
But that's what happens when you see the world through a broken lens
Mistakes can make you grow, that doesn't mean you're friends
Who you are is up to you, don't leave it up to them, no

Yeah, they say when we grow up
You'll understand when you're older
Guess I'm still a kid, I don't know it
If I'll ever let go of this
Say goodbye to the old me
We ain't friends anymore, you don't know me
I know I could die any moment
If I do just remember this

Yeah, they say you got into music, you signed up to be hated
That's kinda weird cause I don't remember signing my name up
Coming from people that give advice but never take none
I like my privacy, but, lately, I feel it's invaded
I heard that life's too short, don't let it pass you by
We waste a lot of time crying over wasted time
It's not about what people think, it's how you feel inside
My biggest failures in life are knowing I never tried, woo!
I look at the world from a different angle
People change; even Satan used to be an angel
Think twice before you're bitin' on the hand that made you
Don't believe what you believe just 'cause that's how they raised you
Think your own thoughts, don't let them do it for you
Say you want a drink, don't wait for people to pour it on you
Cut out the lies, stay close to the people you know are loyal
Grab your own glass and fill it, don't let your fear destroy you, woo!
I heard you told your friends that I'm just not your type
If that's how you really feel, then why'd you call last night?
You say all I ever do is just control your life
But how you gonna lie like that, how you gonna lie like that?

Yeah, I heard you said I ain't the type for you
I don't regret it though, I learned from it
They should have you locked up for all the time you stole from us, (woo)
Took you out when I had no money
Only person that you ever cared about was you, that's why it's so funny
You want somebody that'll keep you warm at night, then, tell me, why you actin' cold to me?
You ain't the only one to blame, no I'm the one that made you rich when I bought every lie you sold to me
Yeah, heard you threw away the pictures
But you still got the memories of us, so I guess I don't really make a difference
Flippin' through 'em in your head
Got you texting me all hours of the night
Yeah, you told me that you needed distance
What's the deal with you?
You say you want a man that keeps it real
Then why you mad when I get real with you?
You want someone to pay the bills for you
Went from failin' you, now I feel for you, liar

I heard you told your friends that I'm just not your type
If that's how you really feel, then why'd you call last night?
You say all I ever do is just control your life
But how you gonna lie like that, how you gonna lie like that?

Look, let me guess, you want to stay friends?
Tellin' people that's how we been?
Tellin' everybody, yeah, that we was barely speakin'
Ah, that's kinda funny, why'd you call me every day then?
It's immaturity, you goin' off the deep end
You just want somebody you can chill and get some drinks with, cool
Then don't hit me on the weekend, tellin' me you missed the way we talked and how I listen, yeah
Why you playin' with my mind, huh?
Why you playin' with my time, huh?
Told me, "We should let it go and put it all behind us"
That's what I did, now you askin' me what I done, I was
Waitin' for this day, I saw it comin'
I think you just like attention, tryna tell me all your problems
I got issues of my own, I ain't got time for all this drama
You told me that you don't really wanna talk—then why you callin', huh?

I heard you told your friends that I'm just not your type
If that's how you really feel, then why'd you call last night?
You say all I ever do is just control your life
But how you gonna lie like that, how you gonna lie like that?

How you gonna lie, how you gonna lie like that?
Baby, how you gonna lie, how you gonna lie like that?
How you gonna lie, baby, how you gonna lie like that?
No, no, how you gonna lie like that?

I heard you told your friends that I'm just not your type
If that's how you really feel, then why'd you call last night?
You say all I ever do is just control your life
But how you gonna lie like that, how you gonna lie like that?

Tell me how you 'bout to lie like that
Tell me how you 'bout to lie like-
Yeah, yeah
I just need some time, I'm tryna think straight
I just need a moment in my own space
Ask me how I'm doin', I'll say "okay," yeah
But ain't that what we all say?
Sometimes I think back to the old days
In the pointless conversations with the old me
Yeah, back when my momma used to hold me
I wish somebody woulda told me

If you want love, you gon' have to go through the pain
If you want love, you gon' have to learn how to change
If you want trust, you gon' have to give some away
If you want love, if you want love

Look, as a kid I used to think life
Is moving so slow, I watch it go by
Look out the window on my bus ride
I thought the world was so small, through my closed eyes
I've always tried to control things
In the end that's what controls me
Maybe that's why I'm controllin'
I wish somebody woulda told me

If you want love, you gon' have to go through the pain
If you want love, you gon' have to learn how to change
If you want trust, you gon' have to give some away
If you want love, if you want love

The older I get, I feel like I'm always tryna save time
Talkin' to the voices in my head, they make me think twice
Tellin' me it doesn't mean it's wrong because it feels right
I'm scared that one day I'll wake up and wonder where'd the time go
Talk about the past like it's the present while I rock slow
I'll sit in the living room and laugh with kids of my own
And tell 'em

If you want love, you gon' have to go through the pain
I wish you woulda told me
If you want love, you gon' have to learn how to change
I wish somebody woulda told me
If you want trust, you gon' have to give some away
You gon' have to give
If you want love, if you want love
If you want love, if you want love
Yeah, I gotta say, like a month ago
I was talking to fans
And one of 'em pulled me aside and said
"We never met, but I swear that you know who I am
I've been through a lot
I don't know how to express it to people, don't think that I can
But I got that Mansion CD on rotation
That's real for me, Nate, you do not understand"
It's crazy for me
Kids hit me up, say they slittin' they wrists on the daily
This music is more than you think
Don't book me for just entertainment, it's entertainin'
Hearin' these parents, they telling their kids
My music is violent—you gotta be kidding me
I guess that your definition of violence and mine
Is something that we look at differently
How do you picture me, huh?
Want me to smile, you want me to laugh?
You want me to walk on the stage with a smile on my face
When I'm mad and put on a mask? For real though
I mean, what you expect from me?
I'm tryna do this respectfully
They say that life is a race
I knew my problems would prolly catch up eventually
I do my best to be calm
How you gon' write me and tell me you'd slaughter my family?
That's just a glimpse to the stuff that gets sent to me
These are the parts of my life they don't never see, woo!
I am aware, it's aggressive
I am not here for acceptance
I don't know what you expected
But what you expect when you walk in a therapy session, huh?

Therapy, therapy session
Therapy, therapy session

This girl at the show looked me in the face
And told me her life's full of drama (Yeah!)
Said her dad is abusive
Apparently, he likes to beat on her mama
I got so angry inside
I wanted to tell her to give me his number
But what you gon' do with it, right?
You gon' hit him up then he'll start hittin' her harder, that's real
These kids, they come to my shows
With tears in they eyes
Imagine someone looking at you
And sayin' your music's the reason that they are alive
Sometimes I don't know how to handle it
This type of life isn't glamorous
This ain't an act for the cameras (nah!)
You see me walk on these stages
But have no idea what I'm dealing with after it, nah!
I put it all in the open
This is the way that I cope with all my emotion
I'm taking pictures with thousands of people
But honestly, I feel like nobody knows me
I'm tryin' to deal with depression
I'm tryin' to deal with the pressure
How you gon' tell me my music does not have a message?
When I'm looking out at this crowd full of people I know I affected, agh!
I got some things in my life
I know I should let 'em go
Let me jot it down
Let me take a mental note
I put it all in this microphone
Think about that for a minute
What is the point of this song? I'm just venting
But what you expect from a therapy session, huh?

Therapy, therapy session
Therapy, therapy session

What you think about me
—That doesn't worry me
I know I handle some things immaturely
I know that I need to grow in maturity
I ain't gon' walk on these stages, in front of these people
And act like I live my life perfectly
That doesn't work for me
"Christian" is not the definition of what "perfect" means
I ain't the type to be quiet
I ain't gon' sit here in silence
If I wouldn't say what I say to your face
Then I promise you, I wouldn't say it in private
I am not lyin'
People go off on my page, and I'm tryin' to quit the replyin'
But this is ridiculous
I'm passionate, man, I really mean what I'm writing
You want me to keep it a hundred?
Okay, I'll keep it a hundred
I see a whole lot of talkin' on socials
But honestly, I don't see nothing in public
I kinda love it, yeah
"Why don't you write us some happy raps?
That would be awesome"
"All of your music is moody and dark, Nate"
—Don't get me started (Yeah!)
You wanna know what it's like if you met me in person?
Listen to my verses
This music is not just for people
Who sit in the pews and pray at the churches, nah!
I won't reject it
I don't expect everyone to respect it
I don't expect you to get my perspective
But what you expect from a therapy session?
Huh?

I mean, I think sometimes people—they confuse what I'm doin'
I write about life, I write about things that I'm actually dealing with
Something, that I'm actually experiencing
This is real for me
Like, this is something that personally helps me as well
I'm not confused about who gave me the gift
God gave me the gift and he gave me the ability to—to do this
And he also gave me this as an outlet
And that's what music is for me
When I feel something, whether it's anger
Um, it's a passion about something—or frustration
Like, this is where I go
This is—this is—that's the whole "NF Real Music" thing, man
This is real for me—I need this
This is a therapy for me
Yeah, real music
Agh! Yo
Just get in that, you get in that head space, y'know? Woo!

Will somebody get the body bags? We gon' put the beats in 'em, nah
Put the MCs in 'em, season 'em, put 'em on a beat with me, then I'm eatin' 'em
Get away from the table, you rappers ain't hungry enough, you rappers ain't hungry like us
They talk about me like I'm here, they talk about you like you was, woo!
That nurse came into my room, she told me I'm sick in the head
I'm in hip-hop's hospital bed, with a pad and a pen and a brace on my neck
They told me that I'm never leavin'—why? I am as ill as it gets
Any rapper that say that they runnin' the game, I'ma come in they session and cut off they legs, woo!
Strap a grenade to my head, pull out the pin, my music is mind-blowin'
Ain't nobody do it like I do it
You ain't ever been on my level, I got a problem with the way they keep on talkin', and actin' like everybody gonna get it, better sleep with your eyes open
You wanna know what I noticed?
Look around at my fan base and they ready (I see you!)
That last album was heavy (I see you!)
That last album was gritty
How you gon' match that? Just let me–
Do what I do best, you're better off playin' Russian roulette
Than comin' in a booth with me 'cause I get a little bit intense—I'm like, "Who's next?"
Y'all better watch it, take a look at where the clock is
It's my time, this ladder of music that I climbed
I took the machete, the game isn't ready, them rappers, they comin' up on me, I cut off the ladder, and I told 'em, "Bye-bye" (Bye-bye)
What, you lookin' for a high-five? Nice try! (Woo!)
Do not believe everything that you read on the Internet
I do not know who your dentist is, but he should clean out your mouth, don't call me a sellout, that's something I've never been
I've been through Hell all my life though, but I know what Heaven is
Father, forgive me, for I am a sinner, but You gave me music as medicine, woo!
And nobody want a problem when they get in my zone, better leave me be!
I'm a mean MC, better feed me rappers or feed me beats, agh!
Feed me both of 'em, they like, "Nate, what's it like to be famous?"
Hahahahahaha, umm, I'll let you know if I make it! (Yeah)
I wonder what life would be like if I didn't stick out my neck
Two hundred dollars inside of my bank account, woo! I was livin' on that
I need some money to pay for my rent, I need some money to pay for my gas
I'm not complainin', I'm just bein' honest, I promise that I will not beg for respect, nah!
I get so frustrated, take a look at what I've created
Time is wasting, and I ain't waiting
I'm a doctor with no job, me, I don't have no patience, I keep pacing–
Back and forth, I keep racing
You ain't never been in my book and I got a problem with it, why? 'Cause you actin' like you read my pages
I wreck these stages, real talk, better give me space 'cause I am chasing
Something they told me that I won't make it, agh!
I'm not famous, I'm just Nathan (Woo!)
And I wonder how the world gon' take this
They might hate it, but you know anything about me, you know that don't mean I'm changin'
'Cause you know I'm real with it, don't care if you feelin' it, I'm feelin' it
You don't like it? Then deal with it
And if God ain't real—real isn't
Used to wonder why I existed, I exist in the world that's real different
And, "What you gon' be when you grow up, Nate?" I doubt they will get it
My life is a mess, better watch your step when you step in it, some of this brain is off-limits
I'm off in a world you don't get, 'cause you ain't ever been in it
In ten minutes I still couldn't explain what's inside my brain, don't mess with it
I've invested a lot of me inside these lines, I'm just protectin' 'em
Everybody wanna hear the real version of life, then don't get so sensitive
When I say something a little bit raw, I jot my thoughts and they call it "negative"
You wanna know where my heart is? I stand out 'cause I wear my garbage
I work my hardest and every time I look into the mirror I don't forget about where I started, woo!

Tell me, what am I doing here?
Tell me, what am I doing here?
Tell me, what am I, what am I doing? Mmm
Tell me, what am I doing here?
I said, what am I doing here?
Tell me, what am I doing here, if
I'm not being real, mmm
What, are you scared of me? That's embarassin'
If it wasn't for me, you would've never wrote Therapy
I've been here for you, but how come you're never there for me?
It's a little bit twisted, but I miss when you and I had scary dreams
I don't really wanna talk about it!
Well, that's too bad now, Nate, shut up!
Now, where were we?
Well, back in the day when
You and I had it all mapped out in the basement
Cryin' in your room like a baby
"I wish mom was here!"
We all do so we wouldn't have to hear about it every single record
You don't really wanna change me
Yeah, I'm the one that made this happen
Do you really wanna get rid of your main attraction?
Let's pack our bags and go back to Gladwin now
Yeah, it's time for the third record
And you know I got the content
I don't wanna make you nervous
But it ain't like it used to be, we got a lotta people watchin'
You told me that you don't want me in your life, that's pretty hard to digest
And I told you I'd leave when we die, and we ain't died yet
Therapy Session was beautiful, Nate, but I'm wonderin' what's comin' next
Yeah, get that stupid hat off of your head when I'm talkin' to you, you hear what I said?
You don't like the prison I built you?
Yeah, you wanna know what the funny thing is?
You keep on talkin' to me like a stranger, but we've been together since you were a kid, yeah
Took us from a no-name, told you everything was okay
Now you tryna cut me out of it like I ain't never been a part of it, I am the heart of it, I made this whole thing
Yeah, I put us on the dope stage, you must have no brain
What's the point of having guns if you can't aim?
What's the point of havin' blood with no veins?
What's the point of havin' love with no pain?
What I'm sayin' is me without you doesn't make any sense
I know I'm intense in controlling, but you need to learn how to cope with it, that's just the way that it is
If you didn't want me to live in your house, you shouldn't have let me move in
It's comfortable here and I like it, I got my own room and everything, it don't get better than this
You say you wanna own your life, then wake up and take your own advice
You just mad 'cause you know I'm right
Yeah, I'm flattered you put me in Mansion, but you should've told 'em right
'Bout your hands on the coldest nights
You didn't tell 'em 'bout the times you and I used to hold the mic
I mean, what are you, outta your mind?
'Cause both of us will be, come on, let's go outside!
Is this what you wanted?
Both of us out in the open? Let's do it then!
I mean, why are you doin' this?
I know that you're mad, but I'm not in the mood for this
We got a record to drop
So why you actin' like I'm not a part of it?
And where is my shovel at?
Prolly out back—where it always is
You can't get rid of all of me!
I'm the reason why—
Nah, shut up, I don't wanna hear another sentence
Hey, I'm NF
"Is it me or the fear talkin'?" Ha! What a dumb question!
Yeah, it's real music 'til the day we die, right?
Yeah, ain't that the slogan, Nathan?
Thought I told you to keep your mouth shut
I mean, so what? You know I never listen
Let me guess, we gon' dig a hole, kill the track, and prolly put a beat in it
Rap about it for like three minutes
Ayy, that's pretty deep, isn't it?
Wait a minute, you don't really think for a second that you're puttin' me in this?
No, of course not, just a little deeper then we'll go inside and we can stop diggin' (woo)
You had me scared for a second, I thought we were diggin' my grave (*thunk*)
We did, what, you don't like bein' afraid?
Here's a dose of your own medicine, what, you don't like how it tastes?
My therapist told me don't bury my issues, but I'ma be honest, man, I'm feelin' great!
I think it's only right we go back to where you were created
I wrote a song for Johnny without you, but he ain't gon' like it, let's see how he takes it (takes it)
He probably don't even remember us, does he?
I wish I was buryin' anger
But both of us know I'ma need him for that song, he still lives in the basement
Almost done, shoulda done this a year ago, I don't know why I waited
You know how I get, I put everything off in my personal life, you hear what I'm sayin'?
That was a joke, yeah, it's hilarious, ain't it?
You'll spend the rest of your life in my backyard or back of my mind, depends how you see it
Put the shovel away, time to go back in the house now, you'll be out in a week
Tellin' me you want your room back, that's funny; what, you ain't got nowhere to sleep?
I'ma just look out the window and laugh at you, this is crazy to me
'Cause I thought you had me in prison this whole time, but I'm the one holdin' the keys
Look, people ask me what the future is
All I know is I'll be doin' this
All I know is things are moving quick
That's convenient for me 'cause that's how I live
Now they see me out here movin' up
You don't like me, that makes two of us
Time change, yeah, I can't adjust
Yo, it’s who you are not who you was, oh my
Yeah, just went to Europe, they said the single is working
I think I'm learning
I am way more than what people might think when they look on the surface
What is my purpose? Yeah
That is a question that I have been asking myself and it hurts
'Cause it's prolly something I should already know but I don’t know it yet, I'm tryna grow as a person, woo!
I'm sick of people tellin' people I'm here 'cause of marketing dollars, oh
You think that everything is gonna blow just 'cause you market it harder? No
I got my hands in everything, now they out here tryna get to me, stop tryna lecture me
You don't compare to my level of thinking, so why do you think you compare to my energy, huh?
Small circle, but the number's growin'
Fame called me, I'm like, "How you doin'?"
Hung up on him, I ain't ready for it
I'll get back to that when I make album four
Less talkin', I've been workin' more
Better me is what I'm workin' towards
Y'all judgin', but we not in court, no, we not in court, oh Lord!
Last couple years, let's recap
I make a livin' off of writin' out my regrets
I'm doin' me, I don't care where the scene's at
Try to give me feedback, I don't really need that
I used to walk on stage in a V-neck
I used to wear a lil' tie with a black vest
I came a long way, why you lookin' upset?
I'm tryna paint a picture, get the vision, you ain't hear it yet, woo!
Look, hold up, hold up, wait a minute, please
Flow's switchin', I got ADD
Brain scatters when you play the beat
It don't matter what you say to me
I'll be doin' this at 83
I've been doin' this since ABCs
In the major leagues doin' major things, don't play with me, woo!
I'm livin' life in the fast lane
Wake up every morning thinkin' I'ma have a bad day
Drive my own car, I don't like the valet
Park then I go into my mind with an AK
Shoot every thought in my head then it rotates
Losin' it all, but I think that I'm okay
Who is involved? I don't know, but I'm insane
Poof! And I'm gone, wanna call me a no name, what!?
I'm prolly not what you thought
I'm prolly not what you thought
I used to judge everybody that wasn't like me 'til I learned it was wrong
Girl told me I should get it together and get out the dark
I'm tryna give her my heart
That's when I sit in my car, writin' for hours until I can barely talk
I mean, where do I start?
Feels like I'm fallin' apart
Act like my image is hard
I always put up my guard
Even when talkin' to God
Sit in my room and I plot
Everything that I'm not
Comes out in the music I jot
I give it all that I got
I give it all that I got!
I'm tryna think out the box, no!
Yeah, I got people standing outside a bus screaming my name
I don't come out and take pictures, they tell me I changed
I don't smile in VIPs, you get mad like, "You know what I paid?"
Guess I don't know what to say
Guess I don't know what to say
I leave it all on the stage
I leave it all on the stage
Woke up in the cell, where am I at?
Yeah, it's cold, but I like that
What am I, trapped?
Heart's beating out of my chest
Door's locked, but the keys are in my hands
Hm, yeah, that's weird, it doesn't make sense, does it?
I make songs, I don't make friends—judge me
Might smile, but it ain't that funny
Sing along to the pain, they love it
Life's like a merry-go-round
And I'm still tryna figure it out
I like space, I don't fit in the crowds
My whole life I've been airin' it out
Oh, I'm gettin' into character now
Feels wrong, but it feels right
My feelings seal tight real nice
But I will fight anything to win
But I'm not Mike Tyson, I won't bite ya
But I will tell you if I don't like you
I am not the norm
I got my own shoes, I ain't tryna fit in yours
I never been married, but I've felt divorced
Hi, I'm Nate, have we met before?
Somebody told you I was wack? Check the source
Somebody told you I was back? Yes, of course
You got a problem with the fans? There's the door
You lookin' for the old me? Check the morgue, agh!
Not a fortune-teller, but I can see into the future better
Ain't no tellin' what'll happen when I pick up the microphone, get the fans together
Same style, but the songs are better
Been a year and a half, feels like it's gone forever
Ain't no drink in my hand, but you know the buzz is comin'
Big steps in the game, yeah, the Hulk is running
My thoughts are funny, it feels like I'm onto something, yeah

I'm high off the music, my head's in the clouds
I kinda like it up here; I am not comin' down
I'd rather be alone, I am not good in crowds
Which is kinda confusin', I know—been that way since a child
They laughin', they tell me I'll never get out
I'm just tryna be me, I am nobody else
I don't care what you think, I'm just bein' myself
So I guess for now

I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I guess I'll be the outcast

Yeah, I guess I don't fit the mold of rap
'Cause I'm respectin' women
"I heard your record, I was laughin at it"
Maybe they would like me more if I got a little graphic with it
Nah, I don't wanna blend in with you little rappin' idiots—I'd rather be the outcast
I ain't never puttin' out trash
I take a hundred and staple it right to my tongue
I always put the money where my mouth's at, agh!
Feels good to be here now
I'm a weird person with a weird crowd
What, you don't like that?
That's cool, that's great, that's fine, okay, you can leave now
Got a weird smile, but I like it though
I paint it on me and I'm walkin' to the microphone
And put the caution tape around me like I did in Intro 1, yeah!
Yeah, they got me reminiscin' now!
Yeah, you done know I'm 'bout to go mad
Never wanted something so bad
Goosebumps through the whole track
Ain't no way I'm gonna hold back
Got me thinkin' that I'm cookin' in a meth lab
I don't blow it up in front of my own eyes
You look a little lost, you ain't get that?
Comin' from a town where nobody is a rapper
Guess I never get the memo, must've missed that
Wow!
Here I go in my feelings again, I can feel it again
So I lay in my bed, in my cell with the pen
And I dwell on my sins, I keep wonderin' when
Time to open the the doors, they don't know who I am
But I pick up the keys and I put on my Timbs
And I stare at the locks and the tat on my skin
And I think to myself, "I don't wanna fit in"

I'm high off the music, my head's in the clouds
I kinda like it up here; I am not comin' down
I'd rather be alone, I am not good in crowds
Which is kinda confusin', I know—been that way since a child
They laughin', they tell me I'll never get out
I'm just tryna be me, I am nobody else
I don't care what you think, I'm just bein' myself
So I guess for now

Yeah, I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I guess I'll be the outcast

Yeah, tryna focus
Take a knife to my head then I cut it open
Take my brain, put it on the floor—tryna figure out my motives
Y'all thought I was an issue when the door was locked
Nah, you should see me when the door opens
Every night I can hear voices
Put a camera in my face, might turn Joker like I'm Mike Posner
Always been a little complex
Difficult to process
Some of y'all wanna sit around and try to pick apart my bars
Here's some lines you could dissect:
If I'ma die, I'ma die givin' everything that I have
Take a deep breath, I don't need y'all's respect
I'm a reject kid at recess playin' games with his make-believe friends
Yeah, I don't ever take a night off
Lights off in the room and I write songs
I might fall into my thoughts once in a while when the mic's off
You ain't ever seen no drive like mine, better hop outta my car
I'm about to unlock my doors
You ain't got a seat belt on, better find one
Gettin' sick of people tellin' me to smile more
T.S. was a chapter I'll never forget, it was therapy for me
But it's time to turn the page now
Hey, shut up! I'm tryna tell 'em my story!
I'm sorry, I wasn't yellin' at y'all, I was talkin' to the voices
I rip out the drums of the industry's ears for tryin' to ignore me and playin' while singin' this chorus

I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I guess I'll be the outcast

I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I'll just be the outcast
I guess I'll be the outcast
Yeah, most of my life's full of sad days
Started at a young age
Yeah, bought a house but I've been livin' on stage
Tryna find the real me, I ain't found it yet
Wake up every morning feelin' like I'm guilty
Talk to God, "Can You hear me?"
Lately, I'm a mess
I don't want no one to help me
Yeah, I don't want no one to help me and

If you think that I make decisions based off of what you think, then you're wrong
Can't nobody think for me, I got my own thoughts
Sometimes you don't know what you had until it's all gone, till it's all gone
If I took the hand that was dealt me then I would be nowhere in life
Yeah, I had to think smart
Threw away the deck and got my own cards
Long before I had the money to afford a car

I–I've been doin' me (yeah)
I've been doin' me
Yeah, I've been doin' me
I've been doin' me
Followin' my dreams
Yeah, I've been doin' me
I've been doin' me
I've been doin' me
Yeah, I've been doin' me
I've been doin' me
Followin' my dreams
Yeah, I've been doin' me

Most of my life's full of regrets
Things I wanna take back, yeah
Wrote you a letter, wish that I had never sent that
Didn't even make sense, I don't even know
All I know is I get lower on the weekends
They tell me I should make friends, I just sit at home
Lately, I've been off the deep end, yeah
I've been off the deep end and

If you think that I'm 'bout to change who I am just for you then you're so wrong
As a kid I built a house around my broke heart
Sometimes you don't know what you had until it falls apart, till it falls apart
If I took the hand that was dealt me then I would be nowhere in life
Yeah, I had to think smart
Threw away the deck and got my own cards
Long before I had the money to afford a car

I (yeah)–I've been doin' me (oh, yeah)
I've been doin' me
Yeah, I've been doin' me (I have been)
I've been doin' me
Followin' my dreams
Yeah, I've been doin' me (followin' my)
I've been doin' me
I've been doin' me (I've been followin' my)
Yeah, I've been doin' me
Followin' my dreams
Yeah, I'm just doin' me
Yeah, I'm just doin' me

Yeah, I'm reminiscin' back to both of us laughin'
Playin' old records, thinkin' every one of 'em's classic
Windows down, we on the street up in Michigan rappin'
We talked about it, but never really knew it could happen
My confidence about as low as the gas is
We didn't have the money for it, so we'd turn the key backwards and sit in parking lots for hours till the battery crashes
I think that we related 'cause both of us were lookin' for answers
A couple months ago I drove into Gladwin, got me all in my feelings
It's somethin' 'bout bein' somewhere that's familiar
Pull in the gas station, open up the tank then I fill it then laugh
Would I move back? Mm, not in a million, but I appreciate the memories we had
I know you've been callin', sorry I never call back
I know I've been distant, you know I never meant that
You can tell the family how I'm doing if they ask
I'm just doin' me
Cold nights, cold nights, long night
Staring down at an empty cup like
I'ma fill, I'ma fill it up
All night, all night
Ten feet down nearly my whole life
But I'll be rising, rising up

Yeah, I know the person in the mirror's not a perfect one
I look at him every day and think he's not enough
My life's a book that I don't really like to open up
I'm twenty-six, but I feel like I live in chapter one
I skim through it, I've been through it, they laugh at us
You think it's funny, yeah, laugh it up
I always felt like no one listened to me, that's how I grew up
Church is where I found God, but it's also where I learned to judge
Yeah, I had to learn there's a difference between
What you want, and what you really need
I've always been motivated by comments from people tellin' me
Things they think I'll never be, and then I become it, this is my everything
There's so much that goes on in my head that people will never see
You probably be terrified of my memories, don't lecture me
Let me be, let me see, let me breathe, how they remember me
Doesn't alter who I am as a person to take my energy, yeah

Hard days, cold nights
Staring down at an empty cup like
I'ma fill, I'ma fill it up
All day, all night
Ten feet down nearly my whole life
But I'll be rising, rising up
Cold nights

Yeah, my fans made me who I am, but they also deceived me
I've been allowed to live life like I'm already grieving
I'm at a table of lies, but don't eat what they feed me
My hoodie over my face, so nobody can see me
I'm on a plane, 'bout to fly again
Looking out the window, take a moment to admire it
Wondering how high it is, wonder where the time has went
Then I shut the window and go back to feeling like I'm out my mind again, agh!
Yeah, seems like we're all trying to climb a ladder
It's crazy what we'll do to climb it faster
It's like we throw away the things in life that really matter
Just so we could make it to the top and wonder what we're even climbing after
I know the feeling of feeling like everything that you deal with
Don't never change, that's part of being a human, yeah
Life's what you make of it, take it, embrace it, and take it, and savor it
Ain't about what you did, it's what you became from it, agh!

Hard days, cold nights
Staring down at an empty cup like
I'ma fill, I'ma fill it up (oh, yeah)
All day, all night
Ten feet down nearly my whole life
But I'll be rising, rising up
Cold nights

We all want what we never had
The good life doesn't seem so bad
The good life doesn't seem so sad
Yeah, we all want what we never had, whoa

Hard days, cold nights
Staring down at an empty cup like
I'ma fill, I'ma fill it up
All day, all night
Ten feet down nearly my whole life
But I'll be rising, rising up

We all want what we never had
The good life doesn't seem so bad
The good life doesn't seem so sad
Yeah, we all want what we never had

Hard days, cold nights
Staring down at an empty cup like
I'ma fill, I'ma fill it up

Cold nights, cold nights, long night
Staring down at an empty cup like
I'ma fill, I'ma fill it up
All night, all night
Ten feet down nearly my whole life
But I'll be rising, rising up
All I ever wanted was somebody to hear me
And all I ever wanted was somebody to feel me
And everybody wanna tell me that I'm out of my head
When I'm on the mic, that's fine, but that don't scare me
It's been a long time, but I'm back now
Rap pow, welcome to the rap house
Rap pow, will live 'til I pass out
Blackout, blackout, everybody keep on wonderin' if I still rap now
Are you serious?
Anybody out there hearin' this?
Yo, I came in the game as a lyricist
And I'ma leave like that, period
You sniff lines, I write lines
You've now entered in my mind
And you better get ready cause you might find
I'm from a different place, and my kind
It's a little bit different than yours is
Quit snoring, hip-hop isn't dead
It's just been in mournin'
From the moment I quit recording
Quick, record this
Listen, I'm warming up and you're misinformed if
You think that I'm slipping up, this ain't sick enough
Then I'll skip the chorus
I've been here, ain't nobody heard of me?
Yeah I'ma turn this beat to a murder scene
I don't live for the world
I live for the King, I live for the King, focus
Wrote this with emotion
It's hard to get a break when the doors ain't open
It's hard to get a shot when the gun ain't loaded
And it's hard to make a living when nobody wanna notice, hold it
What am I insane maybe? Plain crazy
You put me in a room with a mic you will not restrain me
You do what you wanted but you can't contain me, lazy
Is not a character trait of mine, don't wait in line
This is the current condition of my state of mind

Don't tell me that this isn't real
Don't tell me this ain't how I feel
This is all I have, all I have

All I ever wanted was somebody to get this
All I ever wanted was somebody to play this
Yeah, take my song, put it on their playlist
And get goosebumps every time they play it, rate us
If that's my calling or not, Father, maybe I should just not bother
Go back to that nine-to-five, but I am not a
Quitter so quit that
I never been a killer but I guarantee I kill tracks
Put them in a coffin, lost in, rip that
Tryin' to make an impact in rap, is that insane?
Well, I guess so
Rap though, better give me that pencil
And you ain't ever gonna make it, it's all mental
I am in a place where I can't let go, agh!
I still work a job and do this, and y'all know what's stupid?
I thought all you had to do was get a record deal, and, your things start moving
But that's not the case, because most of the times—the artists you hear
You keep on thinking that artist is new, but that artist has prolly been at it for years
Yeah, in the back of my mind thinking, am I wasting my time dreamin'?
And I ain't got no money in my wallet, but I guarantee there ain't no way that I am gonna leave this
I need this, I swear to y'all, I need this
And this hip-hop's in my veins, if you cut me I'ma bleed it
And, yo, what you think I write write raps for? No reason? No
Take my pain and I put 'em in a song—ever since them pills, they took my mom
I've been a different person, don't try to predict my verses
What you're hearing now is me whether I'm in front or behind that curtain
I stand behind these words here, I'm a Christian but I'm not perfect
Don't tell me to calm down, I'm calm now, listen, I'm just working
Yeah, it might take a minute to get it, but once you get it everything will be crystal clear
I don't think they see my vision here, I don't think they see my vision here!

Don't tell me that this isn't real
Don't tell me this ain't how I feel
This is all I have, all I have
Don't tell me that this isn't real
Don't tell me this ain't how I feel
This is all I have, all I have
Don't tell me that this isn't real
Don't tell me this ain't how I feel
This is all I have, all I have
All I have
Don't tell me that this isn't real (this isn't real, this isn't real)
This is all that I have, this is all that I have
Started with phone conversations and I
Flew out to see you, it's raining outside
We sat by the water and talked about life
Oh
Said you lost your dad, girl I know how that feels
I lost my mom, tryna deal with that still
I guess we connect on our hatred for pills
It's real

I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind

You got me thinking things I never used to
I'm not the phone type, I'd rather be with you
Sometimes I hold back from saying, "I miss you"
But I miss you
I have to admit, on this road I get lonely
But you make me smile every time that you call me
You let me be myself
You don't control me

I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind

Laying in my bed, I'm just staring at the ceiling, baby
I just wanna know if you feel what I'm feeling, baby
Got you on my mind yeah, tell me what the deal is lately
Yeah, deal is lately, deal is lately
I'm a man of my word, girl believe that
I'm a closed book but somehow you learn to read that
Know that I should relax, hate the way I react
Thinking that I'm good but you know I'm 'bout to relapse
Thinking that I'm good but you know I'm 'bout to relapse
Girl I wake up in the morning', all I can think of is you

I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
I got you on my mind, baby
I got you on my mind, I got you on my mind
Yeah (haha)
My name buzzin', ain't no way you could ignore it
I did not come this far so they could ignore me
I am not the one to say, "I'll do it in the mornin'"
I'd rather get it done, don't focus on what's not important
They try to talk to me like they been nothin' but supportive
Appreciate the love, but do not show up on my doorstep
If you ain't about that real, I suggest that you avoid me
If we ain't on the same page, that's the end of story, agh!
You are not a baller 'cause your closet's full of Jordan's
You are not a rich man 'cause you're on the Forbes list
First, I dropped a record, then you know I gotta tour it
Real's still the slogan, only difference is there's more of us
The story of my life feels like it's just beginnin' now
I ask you a question, I want answers, not the run-around
You the one that brought it up, but I'm the one to shut it down
If you ain't got the album yet, I brought you one, I'm at your house
Hey!

All I see is green lights (woo!)
All I see is green lights (oh yeah!)
All I spit is real life (yeah!)
Bet you don't know what that's like (huh?)
All I see is green lights (yeah!), woo!
All I see is green lights, (woo!), yeah
All I spit is real life
I bet you don't know what that's like

Yeah
I know where I'm goin', I don't let no one distract me
I don't need directions from nobody in the back seat
I don't need these people in my corner tryna gas me
I'd rather have people in my corner tryna check me
Yeah, I walk off the bus a different city than the last week
Let the fans speak, they gon' tell you 'bout the past me
If I'm bein' honest, last year I was in a bad place
Wouldn't say I'm out of it, but don't feel like I can't be, agh!
Who you know droppin' clean records, but they nasty?
I was made for this, I could tell when Mama had me
I hopped right off the table, told my doctor, "I ain't average."
He asked me, "What does that mean?"
I told him, "Get the pen and pad, please."
Who'd a known I'd write something that could change lives?
I don't think y'all fully understand the way you changed mine
I look at the future that's in front of me with both eyes
Three records, three years, I don't like to waste time
Oh yeah!

All I see is green lights, yeah! (woo!)
All I see is green lights, haha!
All I spit is real life (real life)
Bet you don't know what that's like (you don't know!)
All I see is green lights (green lights), woo!
All I see is green lights (green lights—haha), yeah!
All I spit is real life (oh, real life!)
I bet you don't know what that's like (no!)

Hey!
Haha!
All I see is—green lights!
Yeah!
Oh my!
Yeah! (haha)
This may be the last sunset I'll see
So I'll take it in, I'll take it in
This may be the last air that I'll breathe
So I'll breathe it in, I'll breathe it in

I heard that pictures don't change
Just the people inside of 'em do
Whoever told you that life would be easy
I promise that person was lyin' to you
You got a problem with followin' through
That's why I got a problem with followin' you
You keep lookin' at me like this problem is new
But we've been here before, what you tryin' to do?
Don't talk to me like I don't know what you feeling
'Cause I was there with you back in the beginning
Quit looking away when I talk, let me finish
I'm tryna be honest, you're tryna forget me, ugh
What's wrong with you, hey?
I know that you got a lot on your plate
You keep telling me I should get out of your way
But I can't see how you gon' lie to my face
Don't tell me you fine
'Cause I know that you not, so don't even try it
And what we gon' live for in this life full of pain
'Til we're eighty and one day we'll get up and say we regretted our lives
'Cause that's where we're going
And do not pretend like you don't even notice
The funny thing is that you already know it
I'm starting to think that you like how it feels to be lost in the moment

Lost, lost in the moment
Lost in the moment, lost in the moment
And get lost, lost in the moment
Lost in the moment, lost in the moment

Yeah, they told us that time flies, didn't know what it means
Now I feel like we just running around tryna
Catch it and hoping to cut off it's wings
But that ain't gon' happen
Joy, when was the last time we had it?
I don't remember 'cause all that we do
Is go backwards, but that's what you get
When you live in the past tense
And I know we breathing but we not alive
Really, is this the way we wanna die?
'Till you got everything bottled inside
If only they knew what goes on in our minds
I know what you thinking so don't try to hide
Why do you look at me like you surprised?
If you really mean what you write in these lines
Then why don't you fix it, 'cause I'm getting tired!
Yeah, I can no longer do this
Ever since you fell in love with the music
See? You find a way to express what you feel
But the moment that you get away from the mic, you don't know what you doing
Is it clear to you yet?
I don't know what's going on in your head
But eventually, you'll have to deal with the things
That you talk about yeah, but I guess until then, we're lost!

Lost, lost in the moment
Lost in the moment, lost in the moment
And get lost, lost in the moment
Lost in the moment, lost in the moment

Yeah, oh, yeah, oh lost
Oh, yeah, oh, no no
This may be the last sunset I'll see
So I'll take it in, I'll take it in
This may be the last air that I'll breathe
So I'll breathe it in, I'll breathe it in
Too many faces, too many faces, too many faces

Yeah, what's your definition of success? (ayy!)
I don't trust the thoughts that come inside my head (woo!)
I don't trust this thing that beats inside my chest
Who I am and who I wanna be cannot connect; why?
Don't think I deserve it? You get no respect (woo!)
I just made a couple mil', still not impressed
Let You Down goes triple platinum, yeah, okay, okay, I guess (ayy!)
Smile for a moment then these questions startin' to fill my head, not again!
I push away the people that I love the most; why? (woo!)
I don't want no one to know I'm vulnerable; why? (woo!)
That makes me feel weak and so uncomfortable; why? (ayy!)
Stop askin' me questions, I just wanna feel alive
Until I die—this isn't Nate's flow (woo!)
Just let me rhyme; I'm in disguise
I'm a busy person, got no time for lies; one of a kind
They don't see it; I pull out they eyes; I'm on the rise!
I've been doin' this for most my life with no advice (woo!)
Take my chances, I just roll the dice, do what I like
As a kid, I was afraid of heights, put that aside
Now I'm here and they look so surprised, well so am I, woo!
They don't invite me to the parties but I still arrive
Kick down the door and then I go inside
Give off that "I do not belong here" vibe
Then take the keys right off the counter, let's go for a ride
Why do y'all look mortified? (ayy!)
I keep to myself, they think I'm sorta shy, organized
Let You Down's the only song you've heard of? Well then you're behind (woo!)
Story time; wish that I could think like Big Sean does, but I just can't decide (aah!)
If I should stick my knife inside of Pennywise
I, I don't care what anybody else thinks—lies (haha!)
I do not need nobody to help me—lies
I kinda feel guilty 'cause I'm wealthy; why?
I don't understand, it's got me questionin' like, "Why?
Just tell me why"—not back to this flow
Inside I feel divided
Back when I ain't had a dime, but had the drive
Back before I ever signed, I questioned life, like, "Who am I, man?" Woo!
Nothin' to me's ever good enough
I could be workin' for twenty-four hours a day and think I never did enough
My life is a movie but there ain't no tellin' what you're gonna see in my cinema (no!)
I wanna be great but I get it in the way of myself and I think about everything that I could never be
Why do I do it though? Ayy, yeah
Why you always lookin' aggravated?
Not a choice, you know I had to make it
When they talk about the greatest, they gon' probably never put us in the conversation
Like somethin' then I gotta take it
Write somethin' then I might erase it
I love it, then I really hate it
What's the problem, Nathan? I don't know!
I know I like to preach to always be yourself (yeah)
But my emotions make me feel like I am someone else
Me and pride had made a pact that we don't need no help
Which feels like I'm at war inside myself but I forgot the shells
I hold my issues up for all to see, like show and tell
A lot of people know me, but not a lot know me well
Hold my issues up for all to see, like show and tell
A lot of people know me, but they don't know me well

Too many faces, too many faces, too many faces
Yeah, you, baby, you
You're something special
Baby, I know
I know what you're thinkin'
Maybe, maybe I'm wasting your time
But I promise, but I promise
I know that I go back and forth
But I won't let you, I won't let you, I won't let you down
Yeah

I meant it when I told you I would change
Meant it when I told you I would stay
Sick of talkin' on the phone, babe
Time to pack your car and come to my state
Come to my place, look at my face, oh, yeah
You know I ain't playin'
I'm savin' some money, yeah, hop in the car
And get on the road, here we go
Baby, I can't lie
I'm a little bit, I'm a little bit scared right now, girl, girl, yeah

You said you want more
And I can't blame you for
Askin' me what's somethin' you deserve

You're special
Yo-yo-you're special
Oh yeah, you're special
Yo-yo-you're special

Yeah, I knew it, you was my type
We ain't gotta skip to the highlight
You're the highlight, girl, of my life (woo)
Both of us have got a past, but it's alright
All night car rides
Drivin' through the city, yeah, the view's fantastic
It's automatic, could see you smile, gotta have it
She got me thinkin' maybe I'ma have to put a ring on it, girl
I ain't never been a romantic, but I can romance ya'
Get your shoes on, baby, I am not asking
I'm 'bout to take you out to dinner, put the black dress on
Got the room gaspin', how did this happen?
I don't even know
She's the type to sing my words at the show
She's the type to pick me up when I'm low
And remind me she got my back, no matter what
Yeah, I think she hearin' me now
Say what I think, so I'm thinkin' out loud
I need a woman I know I can trust, and I got one
I guess you can say that she down
Callin' my phone, and she told me she proud
She said my name and I like how that sounds, oh, yeah
(I like that)

I like how this sounds
(Baby, I—yeah)
Baby, don't make me lose myself
Baby, I need somebody I know I can trust (yeah)
I mean, I'm being honest
I ain't ever met a girl like you (no)
Baby, you can call me
You can call me anytime
You can call me any day, anytime
You know I'ma answer
I won't let you, I won't let you down, yeah

You said you want more
And I can't blame you for
Askin' me for somethin' you deserve (You deserve it)

You're special, yeah
Yo-yo-you're special
I said, girl, I said, you're special
I said, you're special
I'm dedicated, the definition of dedication
Wrote this whole record while I was levitating
Sittin' in my room with the pen and paper, I'm innovative
They've been afraid of me since I was a second grader
I'm the kid on the playground mama told you to never play with
There's levels of music—and I'm in the elevator
Going up to the top floor, look how we elevated
What, you don't know the brand by now? You better get educated
Take both of my arms, rip 'em out the sockets and separate 'em
Forgive me, yeah, I know I get animated
Don't matter, I still write a better record than yours without a hesitation
Never been more motivated
Just look at all the minds I have opened and penetrated
See, I am the voice of all these kids that think things, but never say 'em
That's why they come to my shows wearing the NF hoodies and hats low like we're carrying weapons, ah!
Put the controllers away, it's game over
I promise I'm way colder
The fans keep saying that they're hungry for new music
Well that's pretty convenient 'cause I just made a plate for 'em
And I don't hear what none of y'all are saying
I just sit at the keys feeling the music
Got me thinking I'm Beethoven
The game needs a makeover
If you've been waiting, the wait's over
You ain't notice, y'all about to witness a takeover, I'm home!
Yeah, they waiting on me to match the
Emotion that I had in the last one
What if I don't, they gon' tell me that I'm losing my passion?
If I do, am I repeating my actions?
Yeah, look, "How Could You Leave Us" is massive
There ain't nothing I can write that'll match that
My biggest fear writing this record wasn't putting out trash
It was disappointing myself and the fanbase
Now I want you to picture me:
I'm in a hotel rapping, crying on the floor of the bathroom
Staring in the mirror, my room, hands shaking playing "How Could You Leave Us" through the speakers on my iPhone
Tryna figure out if I'ma always feel the way that I feel or maybe someday I can learn to be happy
Or maybe I can't be, 'cause if the music ain't emotional enough, are they gon' call me a has-been?
Pain's always been the root of my music
If I cut it off, how am I supposed to keep growing
If I let it go, won't my whole career be in ruins?
That's when I realized this whole conversation is stupid
I never cared to impress people that don't even know me
I just write what I feel, somehow it started a movement
Trying to enjoy a career, but I don't know how to do it
When I spend all of my time being afraid I'ma lose it!
But, then I figured out the reason they follow me
The reason why these fans surrounding me
It's not 'cause I'm a "Rap God"
I don't need you people to bow to me
All they ever did was doubt on me, now everyone's proud of me
Acknowledge me or not, you ain't ignoring the following
I'm just teaching 'em something they couldn't learn in they colleges
This is for the kids feeling like they live at the bottom and every day of they lives, feels like it's darker than Halloween!
Yeah, you ain't alone out there, look around you—we got a lot of fans in here
Couple hundred thousand, that's what we did last year
Listen to Intro III, trying to kill my fear
They'll get that in a minute
We about to shatter the critics
I am a savage, admit it
A lot of baggage I live in
That's why the passion is different
Really don't care if they get it
We're only three records in it and this is just the beginning
I'm home!

Real music
You spend your life in a dream that you can't escape
'Cause you live your life in a coma, you're never awake
If you'd open your eyes then maybe you'd see what's at stake
You're sleeping, you're sleeping

You make a lot of money and you live in a mansion
And pretty much got everything that you could ever imagine
But you feel like even though you got everything in the world
You got nothing
So what you do then is you start going backwards
You runnin' in a direction
And you lookin' for something that isn't real
And all you know is that you just gotta have it
What you're doin' is sleepin'
And thinking that you're awake and you're not
And the problem is that you don't know what you're after
So you put everything that you have into what you do
Hoping that one day maybe you don't have to feel like you're empty
But as you get older a lot of weight on your shoulders is getting heavy
Then you look back and you start to regret things
You only get one life
And every time you lookin' at yours
You feel like everything you have is a waste!
And the problem and the reason you could never fill a hole in your life
Is because you were never awake

You spend your life in a dream that you can't escape
'Cause you live your life in a coma, you're never awake

Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!

You wake up in the morning
But you feel like you never got up and go to work
And you feelin' like you ain't got a purpose
And you tryna get motivated but everything you do turns into a mess
Like you ain't nothing but worthless
And, yo, you look around
A lot of these other people you lookin' at
To you, you describe as perfect
So you point a finger at God and tell him to do his job
And fix ya life up 'cause nothin' is workin'!
And you will try to hide it and make it seem like it's nothin'
But really you feel like everything is crashin' around you
And you developed a problem in trusting in other people
Which later became an issue that would mentally pound you!
You only get one life
But every time you lookin' at yours you feel like all you ever see are mistakes
And the problem and the reason you could never move forward in life
Is because you were never awake!
Wake up

You spend your life in a dream that you can't escape
'Cause you live your life in a coma, you're never awake

Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!
Wake up, wake up, wake up, wake up!

You spend your life in a dream that you can't escape
'Cause you live your life in a coma, you're never awake
Only time you ever call me is when you feelin’ like don't nobody else wanna listen
When’s the last time you saw me
You probably don’t remember that ’cause that was back then you were different
I don’t wanna hear the sorry’s
I’m tired of all the talkin’ to be honest I would rather see a difference
Yeah, you pass me in the hallway
But you ain’t say a word to me
Lately all I ever feel is distant
You don’t care that you lost me
What’s wrong with ya
Had a picture of you sittin’ on the dash in the car with me
Now it’s in my closet with the other ones sittin’ in a box
I don’t wanna open up
You took it all from me
Told me you would die for me
Yeah, all you ever do is lie to me
Wish that I could say that this has come as surprise see to me
Told me that I never took the time and now you ain’t got the time for me
Yeah

I just wanna know oh, oh, oh, oh
When did you get so cold oh, oh, oh
What happened to your soul oh oh  oh
Don’t you see me

We used to talk like best friends
I remember that I guess I don’t know what happened to us
Now you got me questionin’ what trust is
You told me you would be there for me
Yeah, but you ain’t really mean it did ya
Now you wanna jump ship
Leave me here alone
Well, I’m used to it
Everybody else did
Who you havin’ fun with
Don’t tell me I don't wanna know every time I ask I just feel sick
You're the one that jumped in
Told me you had some feelins
Now you tryin’ to tell me that is not true
I ain’t gotta clue
Who I’m lookin’ at right now, but I know the person that I’m lookin’ at is not you
Yeah
They say that you are who you hang with
Maybe that’s the reason you been changin’
Maybe that’s the reason why I’m feelin’ like you’re dangerous
And every time we talk it’s like I’m talkin’ to a stranger

I just wanna know oh, oh, oh, oh
When did you get so cold oh, oh, oh
What happened to your soul oh oh  oh
Don’t you see me
I thought that we were close oh, oh
But now that door is closed oh, oh
When did we lose control oh, oh, oh
Guess you don’t need me
I just wanna know oh, oh, oh, oh
When did you get so cold oh, oh, oh
What happened to your soul oh oh  oh
Don’t you see me
I thought that we were close oh, oh
But now that door is closed oh, oh
When did we lose control oh, oh, oh
Guess you don’t need me
Yeah, look

I mean this with love when I say it
I wanna answer the phone when you call me
The problem is, it's 10 a.m. and you're already drinkin'
You're probably already wasted
What's the point in having conversation with somebody that
Won't remember we had conversations, yeah, we always talk about the same things, we just say 'em different
Try to fix it, crazy, isn't it?
You say, "Mom was always proud" and played the videos of us as kids, I get it
I think that both of us live in the past, so we take for granted the present
Maybe next time I'm in Michigan, I'll come and visit
We ain't got a lot in common but both of us miss her
We could sit inside your smoke-filled livin' room, and tear up together, that's real

I might do some things you don't like
We all make mistakes, that's just life
They might say I changed, that's alright
That's alright, that's alright
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
My life, my life

You know my patience is very thin
Wish I was there again
I'm not embarrassed to say that we've always had issues
I'm embarrassed to say that we never took care of 'em, yeah
Pain will always find its way to the surface
No matter how deep you bury him
Growin' up, I felt like no one ever really got me, eventually
I took that out on relationships (woo)
I put my arm around you, and I mean it, I love you to death
These are the moments I know I'ma always hold onto and cherish 'em, yeah
Life's about taking chances, making moves
Not about what you did, it's what you do
Build on what you got and learn from what you lose
And never let people distract you from being you

I might do some things you don't like
We all make mistakes, that's just life
They might say I changed, that's alright
That's alright, that's alright
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
My life, my life

That's just my, that's just my, that's just my
That's just my, that's just my, that's just my
That's just my, that's just my, that's just my
(Oh no no no) Yeah
That's just my, that's just my, that's just my
That's just my, that's just my, that's just my
That's just my, that's just my, that's just my
Life

That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
That's just my life, my life, my life, my life
My life, my life
(Yeah!) I'm back, did anyone miss me?
They said the second record can be tricky
Well, that's kind of funny, 'cause I am not trippin'
My fans—they know what it is and they with me
Yeah, I ain't the type that's gon' ride with the semi
I came from a town with three lights and no city
I've been doing shows for nothin' but pennies
When I leave the stage, they never forget me
Mansion was a glimpse of my life
I let you see what it's like to be in my head
People ask me what I think I think I'd be doin'
If it wasn't music, I'd rather be dead, agh!
You heard what I said, that was like me at a three
You don't wanna see me at ten
Or maybe you do
I promise if that is the case, then that is what y'all gonna get
If you're looking for music with watered down lyrics
I promise that you need to go somewhere else
And if you want somebody to tell you everything
That you wanna hear, I won't be any help
This flow is familiar, I think I heard it before
Yeah, I made it myself!
I left the door open to come in my mansion
But I never said it's a beautiful house
Some of y'all sat on the porch
Looked at my windows and stared at my door
They ask me if I'm gonna kill it this record
I laugh in their face and I ask 'em, "Do you see the blood on the floors?"
"He's at it again"
"NF is crazy, he's bad for the kids"
"He never talks about nothing but him"
"And my friends say, 'He's kind of a diva.'"
Well, you need to get some new friends
I'm as chill as it gets
'Til I get on the stage and flip on the switch
And I go to a place where nobody is
If you bring up my name in a song, that's something that you will regret
Learned a lot in a year
I remember the shows when no one was there
I remember the shows when nobody cared
Some people in front of me laughing like, "He isn't going nowhere."
It's funny now, isn't it?
This type of life isn't how I envisioned it
This type of life, it just ain't how I pictured it
I'm in the back of the tour bus
Tryin' to FaceTime my family, it's different
Not what you think it is
Write a review, tell me what you think of this
Give me three stars and call me an idiot
But to be honest, it don't make a difference
I know some people don't get it
But you have now entered a therapy session
If you don't like music that's personal
I have no clue what you people are doin' here, might as well throw out the record
I pull up a chair, I talk to my music like nobody's there
Only person I judge is the one in the mirror
And lately, he ain't doin' well
I don't need y'all in my ear
I'm tired of hearin' it
You call it music, I call her my therapist
She keep on telling me I have been carryin'
Way too much baggage, I need to take care of it
I know she's right, but, man, it's embarrassing
Music has raised me more than my parent did
Take out a picture of us and I stare at it
Who am I kiddin'? You probably ain't hearin' this
Show me an artist you wanna compare me with
You put us both on a track, I'ma bury 'em
Give me the shovel, it's 'bout to get scarier
None of you want it with rap, who you staring at?
I see you got beats, but where is the lyrics at?
NF is the logo, you know I've been wearin' that
Don't come to my show and be sittin' that very back
I call you out in the crowd like, "There he is!"
Thought I'd be happy, it feels like I'm cursed
It's hard to be clean when you play in the dirt
You gave me this place to go when I'm hurtin'
I thought it'd get better, but it's getting worse
And I got nobody to blame when I work
Like 24/7, I ain't been to church
And Satan keep callin' me, he tryna flirt
I hang up the phone, these are more than just words
I drive on that highway and listen to Mansion
I look up to God like, "When did this happen?"
Yellin' with all of my fans to wake up
But feel like I haven't
I get emotional, I didn't plan this
I'm doing things I never imagined
I'm sorry, but I gotta leave
I don't wanna be late for my therapy session, agh!
When I die, put my ashes in a trash bag
I don't care where they go
Don't waste your money on my gravestone
I'm more concerned about my soul
Everybody's gon' die
Don't everybody live though
Sometimes I look up to the sky
And wonder…

"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord, oh)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord, oh)? Oh Lord?"

Listen! Yeah, everybody wants change
Don't nobody wanna change though
Don't nobody wanna pray
'Til they got something to pray for
Know everybody's gon' die
But don't everybody live though
Sometimes I look up to the sky
And wonder…

"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord, oh)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord, oh)? Oh Lord?"

It's easy to blame God, but harder to fix things
We look in the sky like, "Why ain't you listening?"
Watchin' the news in our livin' rooms on the big screens
And talking 'bout, "If God's really real, then where is he?"
You see the same God that we're sayin' might not even exist
Becomes real to us, but only when we dyin' in bed
When you're healthy, it's like, we don't really care for Him then
Leave me alone God, I'll call you when I need you again
Which is funny, everyone will sleep in the pews
Then blame God for our problems like he's sleeping on you
We turn our backs on him, what do you expect him to do?
It's hard to answer prayers when nobody's prayin' to you
I look around at this world we walk on
It's a smack in the face, don't ever tell me there's no God
And if there isn't then what are we here for?
And what are y'all doing down there? I don't know, Lord

"(Do you see us? Oh Lord)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord, oh)? Oh Lord?"
"Do you see us down here, oh Lord (oh Lord, oh)? Oh Lord?"

Do you see us down here, oh Lord?
Can you see us down here, oh Lord?
Oh Lord, oh Lord
Can you see us?
Can't you see us?
When did I become so numb?
When did I lose myself?
All the words that leave my tongue
Feel like they came from someone else

I'm paralyzed, where are my feelings?
I no longer feel things, I know I should
I'm paralyzed, where is the real me?
I'm lost and it kills me inside, I'm paralyzed

When did I become so cold?
When did I become ashamed? (ohh)
Where's the person that I know?
They must have left, they must have left, with all my faith

I'm paralyzed, where are my feelings?
I no longer feel things, I know I should
I'm paralyzed, where is the real me?
I'm lost and it kills me inside, I'm paralyzed

I'm paralyzed
I'm scared to live, but I'm scared to die
And if life is pain, then I buried mine
A long time ago, but it's still alive
And it's taking over me—where am I?
I wanna feel something, I'm numb inside
But I don't feel nothing, I wonder why
I'm on the race of life and time passes by
Look, I sit back and I watch it
Hands in my pockets
Waves come crashing over me, but I just watch 'em
I just watch 'em
I'm under water but I feel like I'm on top of it
I'm at the bottom and I don't know what the problem is
I'm in a box, but I'm the one who locked me in
Suffocatin', and I'm running out of oxygen

I'm paralyzed, where are my feelings?
I no longer feel things, I know I should
I'm paralyzed, where is the real me?
I'm lost and it kills me inside, I'm paralyzed

I'm paralyzed (I'm just so paralyzed)
Where are my feelings? (Yeah, I'm just so paralyzed)
I no longer feel things (I have no feelings)
I know I should (Oh, how come I'm not moving? Why aren't I moving? Ay yeah)
I'm paralyzed
Where is the real me? (Where is the real me? Where is the real me?)
I'm lost and it kills me - inside (I'm paralyzed, I'm paralyzed)
I'm paralyzed (I'm paralyzed)
Call me at 3 a.m., tellin' me that I could be the one, oh, yeah
Maybe I was in love from the outside, guess I ain't what you want no more
If you got someone else inside of your life, yeah, that's good for you, I'm happy
You got someone that makes you smile more than I ever did, yeah, that's great

Listen, why they always tryna hurt me?
Why they always tryna burn me?
I swear to God, shoulda never even happened in the first place
Only time you hit me's on my birthday
Wish that I could tell you that I got a lot of love for you
Wish that I could tell you I got trust for you
Once you put some money in the bank you understand that the money ain't enough for you
Yeah, look what it's done to you
Everyone's your friend when the music start buzzin'
I'm closer to the people that were there when I was nothin'
Tryna talk about the past but you always changin' subject
I ain't good at shakin' hands but I'm good at holdin' grudges
Why you always frontin', huh? Always tryna play wit' me (woo)
Yeah, whatchu gotta say to me?
I am not a slave to the people writin' checks to me
This is destiny, they ain't never had respect for me, ah!

Call me at 3 a.m., tellin' me that I could be the one, oh, yeah
Maybe I was in love from the outside, guess I ain't what you want no more
If you got someone else inside of your life, yeah, that's good for you, I'm happy
You got someone that makes you smile more than I ever did, yeah, that's great

I don't like that!
I don't like that, no! (I'm really sorry)
I don't like that!
Why you actin' shady on me?
Why you always tryna-
Why you always tryna play, I ain't got a clue right now
Everything I ever wanted was someone, I'm watching them go

Yeah, you said I'm scared for you
Lemme say a prayer for you
Hope you never make it to the top just to find out there ain't nothing there for you
And now the people tryna tell you that they care for you, never cared for you
First time that you ever told me that you loved me, I know that was probably weird for you
'Cause I didn't say it back, I'm so caught up in the past, and I know I wasn't fair to you, woo!
Maybe I don't see the world like I'm s'posed to
Maybe I'm just living in a nightmare
Maybe all the people that I thought that I was close to
Wouldn't be around if it wasn't for my career
Yeah, this third record doesn't pop off, how many people 'bout to drop off?
I know how it works, if the record doesn't work, then it's my fault
I'm in a room full of fans singin' my thoughts, my God, woo!

Call me at 3 a.m., tellin' me that I could be the one, oh, yeah
Maybe I was in love from the outside, guess I ain't what you want no more
If you got someone else inside of your life, yeah, that's good for you, I'm happy
You got someone that makes you smile more than I ever did, yeah, that's great

I don't like that!
I don't like that, no! (I'm really sorry)
I don't like that!
Why you actin' shady on me?
Why you always tryna-
Why you always tryna play, I ain't gotta clue right now
Everything I ever wanted was someone, I'm watching them go

Yeah, yeah, I'm done with that
Reminiscing 'bout all we had
We got nowhere to go, you got all the things you wanted
Got everything that you wanted
Yeah
Oh yeah (oh yeah!)
Just let me work, no, just let me work, no
I'm out here grindin'
Yeah, I'm out here grindin' (woo!)
I told 'em (oh yeah!) that I'm out here grindin'
I'm out here gri—(hey, hey!)

You ain't never heard nothin' like this
Let me work, show me where the mic is
I'm on stage, black shirt, in my Timbs
You know how I do it, I ain't playin' with you, I've been grindin' Anybody tryna sleep on me better do somethin' with your eyelids
I hear a lot of whinin', but I don’t hear a lot of rhymin', woo!
Everybody got opinions, let it go into my ear and then I block that
Put me on stage, I'ma rock that
Sayin' you the best? Stop that
Phony, I am not that, yeah
What are y'all doin' out here? What are y'all doin' out here?
Maybe you should spend a little less time with the women on your arms and a little bit more with your career
I ain't saying I'm the best, but I should be in the top ten; give me a list of names, I'ma top them
I'm just playing with ya, I don't care where the top is
Leave me at the bottom, let me work for it
You ain't never gonna find another rapper in the game and tell me that he works more
Tell me that he works more, nah!
You might see me with my hoodie up, I ain't leaving 'til I finish
This industry ain't nothing but a box, but I ain't gon' climb in it
You put me inside a room full of rappers, come back in five minutes
I'ma be the only one still alive, with a note on my chest saying that I did it!
You do it for fame, we are way different
Y'all are looking weak, we ain't cooking in the same kitchen
Everybody got a shirt with a stain in it
Some of us'll never wear it out though, lemme get it!
I guess I don't understand
This wasn't part of my plan
Some of these people, they're thinking 'cause they heard the name that they really know who I am
Bring the beat down!
I got no time for these Hollywood people, I'd rather give time to my fans
You'd rather chill with these women that like you for money
But I'd rather chill with my fam, yeah
I'm out here grindin'
I'm out here grindin'
Yeah, I see the mic but you looking like a pilot
What's the point of a plane if you don't know how to fly it?
Yeah!

I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', all I do is work, all I do is work

Rise of the underdog, I don't like none of y'all
I'm not like one of y'all
I'm from the jungle, I run with the son of God
Yeah, what is you running for?
They should be running from me
Most of my family, we don't even speak
I'm getting married in 22 weeks
And they still haven't said "Hi" or wanted to meet, huh?
I'm not the type to complain
If we don't get it, we try it again
And I'd die for the gang, Misfit my blood
They don't like us and we question they mom like
"Why did—why did you allow your kid to like bad music?"
Woo! Promise I do it (woo!)
I'm tryna give you my everything
I don't care what they are doing
I'm tryna do what they couldn't do
Laugh at the rappers you look up to
Don't waste time with the centerfolds (ay!)
I'm alive, it's a miracle (ooh)
Freestylin' since middle school (woo!)
I will battle the principal (woo!)
Wear all black like a funeral
I'm doing me, I don't live for you (ayy!)
Grindin'!

I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', all I do is work, all I do is work
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', okay okay okay
I'm out here grindin', all I do is work, all I do is work
I'm grindin'

Oh yeah, oh yeah, oh yeah
I'm out here, I'm out here grindin'
All I, all I, all I do is work
All I, all I, all I do is grind (woo!)
Yeah
I wanna know, I wanna know
I wanna know, I wanna know

Been sick with the pen since I was ten inches tall
I'm relentless, you guessed it, back with the vengeance
In the set list, every sentence so raw you can sense it
No question, tryna be the best that
Ever walked this earth, if I'm not, then I'm next up
Dressed up like I'm 'bout to hit a bank or somethin'
Yeah, I am not the one you wanna mess with, no!
When I come into the room, put your heads down
I'm a little bit TØP, Stressed Out
What does that mean?
I'm a rap fiend with a bad lead
You could run if you want, but you'll never catch me
So cold with it, y'all don't get it
Let you put me in a cage just so I can open it
Handcuffed, hands up, this is dope to me
Oh, you thought you had me captured? So funny
Better run from me, I don't think you really understand what this does for me
I dress bummy, but I clean up nice, they ain't never seen this side of me
Long T-shirt, they eyein' me
Rules don't apply to me
You better give me my privacy
I got the fans I got because I'm takin' them behind the scenes
You played hide-and-seek, I played hide-from-me, agh!
Yeah, look at all that we accomplished
Quittin' for me's not an option
I wanna look at my kids in the face when I'm older and say I did something admirable
Fast checks, fast women, that don't inspire me, no!
You don't wanna know what's goin' on inside my personal life? Then get out my diary, yeah

I wanna know what it's like to be happy
I wanna know what it's like to wake up in the morning and feel like it's real when I'm laughin' (yeah!)
I wanna know what it's like to sit down with my friends and feel like they might understand me (woo!)
I wanna know that the people around me care less about Grammys and more about family

I wanna know, I wanna know, I wanna know (Yeah, yeah!)
I wanna know, I wanna know
I wanna know, I wanna know (Yeah, I wanna know)
I wanna know, I wanna know

Yeah, record labels' signin' artists, they ain't got a clue what to do with
Why would I put my career in the hands of someone that don't even know what they doin'?
Why would I sit in a room full of people that don't even care about me or my future and tell me they ain't really feelin' the vision, then hop on the wagon the moment it's movin', huh?
Heard you tellin' people you don't really like the content
Whatchu wanna hear me rap about?
How I'm on the road gettin' side chicks?
You should treat your mouth like your phone in a movie theater, put that on silence
I don't care what everybody else is doin', I'm just bein' me and that's not how I live
Oh my, oh my, yeah, I'm in the zone now
Zoned out, come to my show with they phones out
Whole crowd, oh wow, that's wild, tone down, no!
I have created my own style
I have created my own sound
Oh, you didn't know? Well, you know it now
Slowin' down
Livin' happy, this is what I was made for
They say you get what you paid for
Grandpa told me, "Always look to Heaven, try to pay attention when you talkin' to God," yeah
I wish I'da paid more, I shoulda prayed more
Everybody's out here shoppin' tryna find a different product in the same stores
Everybody wants they dream to fall in they lap, but don't wanna work for it
I've been doin' this since I was just a kid and mama bought me 8 Mile at the movie store
Hopin' someday maybe I could do what I love for a livin' with people I care for
People that care more about me as person than money I make for 'em, yeah!

I wanna know what it's like to be happy
I wanna know what it's like to wake up in the morning and feel like it's real when I'm laughin' (yeah!)
I wanna know what it's like to sit down with my friends and feel like they might understand me (woo!)
I wanna know that the people around me care less about Grammys and more about family

I wanna know, I wanna know, I wanna know (Woo! Yo!)
I wanna know, I wanna know (Yeah, I wanna know)
I wanna know, I wanna know
I wanna know, I wanna know (Woo!)

I wanna know, I wanna know (Woo! Yeah!)
I wanna know, I wanna know (Yeah, I wanna know)
I wanna know, I wanna know (Yeah, I wanna know)
I wanna know, I wanna know
Oh these hands are tired
Oh this heart is tired
Oh this soul is tired
But I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on

Faith is something I am not accustomed to
And trusting other people's something I don't really love to do
I've never been a fan of it, I act tougher
Really my shoulders they ain't built for this and I don't have nothing
It's like I'm standing in the rain and you offer me a raincoat
But I would rather stand there and get wet than take the handout
What's wrong with me? You said you've always got your hands out
And I cannot continue on my own, so take my hands now
I give you everything, God, not just a little bit
Take it from me, I am nothing but a hypocrite
I hate sin, but I built a house and I still live in it
Afraid to open up the door to You and let You into it
My soul is lost and what it needs is Your direction
I know, I've told You I do not need Your protection
But I lied to You, this thing is tiring
And man was not created for it, God
Please retire me now

Oh these hands are tired
Oh this heart is tired
Oh this soul is tired
But I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on

Trust is something I am not accustomed to
And I know the Bible says I should always trust in You
But, I don't never read that book enough
And when I have a question I don't take the time to look it up
Or pick it up
It collects dust on my nightstand
I'm just being honest
Please take this outta my hands
I have no control - I am just a person
But thank the Lord that I serve a God that's perfect
I do not deserve the opportunity You've given me
I never knew what freedom was until I learned what prison means
I am not ashamed, I don't care if they remember me
My life will always have a hole, if You are not the centerpiece
Take me out of bondage, take all of my pride
If I don't have a Savior, I don't have nothing inside
Take all of my lust, take all of my lies
There's no better feeling than when I look in the sky, in Your eyes
It's amazing

Oh these hands are tired
Oh this heart is tired
Oh this soul is tired
But I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on

Woaahh
Woah woah woah
Woaahh
Woah woah woah
Woaah
Woah woah woah
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
Woaahh
Woah woah woah
Woaahh
Woah woah woah
Woaah
Woah woah woah
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
Woaahh
Woah woah woah
Woaahh
Woah woah woah
Woaah
Woah woah woah
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
I'll keep on
Breathe
Breathe

I grew up in a small place, had to drive an hour just to see a movie
I'm a simple person, city life just doesn't move me
I'd rather be home with my grandparents and playing Euchre
Didn't wanna leave but this dream's calling, I had to do it
I left my girl there, wish I would've done it different
She was right when she told me that I don't ever listen
I told her I would change a million times and never did it
Apologies don't mean a thing if you don't ever fix it
I love what I do but it's not what I expected
This industry is not your friend, well that's my perspective
Sometimes the closest people to you make you feel protected
But those are the same people that hurt you most and leave you guessing
Some people say nobody's perfect but expect perfection
How you supposed to find the answer if you don't ask the question?
Sometimes I look into the mirror and talk to my reflection
When I go home and turn the music off, what am I left with?

Breathe
Breathe

We used to be close but as time passed, we became disconnected
You never felt love and I always felt disrespected
Your family thought I was a joke, I was always defensive
They just wanted what was best for you, I just couldn't accept it
And hurting you was not a part of my plan or my intentions
But I was immature, I guess I had to learn some lessons
We grew apart and our lives went in different directions
And there's a lot of responsibilities that I neglected
I had a lot that was bottled inside, couldn't express it
And this pain won't leave, I can feel the depression
It's taking over my body, feels like I'm always stressing
Doctor told me I should sleep, but I'm always restless
I lay awake at night and think, my thoughts are relentless
I need a moment to breathe, I need a moment to vent this
I seem to be the only person that I play pretend with
And when I turn the music off, what am I really left with huh?

Breathe
Breathe
I talk to God like, "What's next for me?"
I'm just fulfillin' my destiny (destiny)
Fulfillin' my destiny, yeah
I talk to God like, "What's next for me?"
I'm just fulfillin' my destiny (destiny)
I'm just fulfillin' my destiny, yeah!

I told y'all I'm a psycho
Ain't no tellin' what I might do, yeah
Doubt put his hands around my throat, so I cut 'em off
That's what you get for steppin' on my toes
At the top of the key, that's an iso
My career about to take off, flight mode
You don't like where we're headed, what you sittin' on my flight for, huh?
Yeah, they said, "Wait u